Washington statutes.
RCW 18.44.510

Compensation and travel expenses of committee members.

The committee members shall each be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided for state officials and employees in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, when called into session by the director or when otherwise engaged in the business of the committee.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 21 s 49; 1984 c 287 s 37; 1977 ex.s. c 156 s 29. Formerly RCW 18.44.215.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 21: See note following RCW 72.23.025.

Legislative findings—Severability—Effective date—1984 c 287: See notes following RCW 43.03.220.